Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.060

Confidentiality of examination information.

This title does not limit the privileges, immunities, and requirements of RCW 42.56.400(6), 30A.04.075, 32.04.220, and 33.04.110 in relation to trust companies, state banks, and state savings associations.

[ 2014 c 37 s 308.]